Idaho, session 2025, H0395.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-335, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-335. COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT AND RATEPAYER PROTECTION. (1) For the
purposes of this section:
(a) "New large load" means any electric load associated with a new ser-
vice entrance, an existing service entrance, or an expansion of an ex-
isting service entrance that results in an increase in power require-
ments of such service entrance of thirty (30) megawatts or more in any
consecutive twelve (12) month period.
(b) The following terms shall have the same meaning as provided for in
section 61-332A, Idaho Code:
(i) "Commission";
(ii) "Consumer";
(iii) "Electric service";
(iv) "New service entrance";
(v) "Public utility"; and
(vi) "Service entrance."
(2) A public utility providing a new large load service to a customer
shall not provide such service from its existing resources or from resources
that have been identified and are planned or anticipated to serve its gen-
eral body of ratepayers within ten (10) years from the initial date of ser-
vice of the new large load. A public utility may recover the costs associated
with a new large load service from only that customer and may not recover any
costs associated with a new large load service from any other ratepayer. The
prohibited costs include but are not limited to cost of capital, generation,
transmission, and distribution, and customer-related costs.
(3) To further the competitive supply of electric service for a new
large load, an electric consumer may receive electric service for a new large
load, entirely or in part, from an entity other than the public utility that
would otherwise be selected to provide such service pursuant to the electric
supplier stabilization act, sections 61-332 through 61-334C, Idaho Code.
The public utility shall make its transmission, distribution, and electric
supply delivery facilities available, at cost, to facilitate such competi-
tively procured electric service.


(4) A new large load does not change its status as such by means of ar-
tifice such as by splitting its load among more than one (1) electric sup-
plier or by adding additional connections, meters, or new service entrances
to serve an otherwise single entity or enterprise.
(5)(a) The commission may promulgate rules, subject to legislative
approval, to implement the provisions of this section, facilitate the
competitive procurement of electric services for a new large load, and
ensure there are no cost shifts from a new large load to the public util-
ity's other customers.
(b) The commission shall have the jurisdiction to resolve all disputes
arising under this section.
(6) Providing electric service pursuant to this section shall not be
construed to:
(a) Be a grant of preference or advantage;
(b) Subject any person or corporation to any prejudice or disadvantage;
or
(c) Have established or to maintain any unreasonable difference in
rates, charges, or services in any respect.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.